Illinois, session 104th, HB3759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by changing Section 3 and by adding Section 3.21a as 6follows: 7    (410 ILCS 620/3)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 503)8    Sec. 3. The enumerated acts in Sections 3.1 through 3.21a 93.21 and the causing thereof are prohibited in this State.10(Source: P.A. 84-891.) 11    (410 ILCS 620/3.21a new)12    Sec. 3.21a. Contracting to delay the entry of a drug into 13the marketplace.